Tennessee, session 114, HB0763.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 29-20-407, is amended by deleting
"governmental entities representing cities and counties" and substituting "cities, counties, or
other governmental entities as contemplated by this part".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0763
002623
- 1 -